California statutes. Labor Code
 appropriations approved by the Legislature for the State Public Works Enforcement Fund, the statewide general administrative costs assessed to the State Public Works Enforcement Fund, and a prudent reserve amount of no less than 10 percent and no more than 20 percent of authorized expenditure levels. Any year-end fund balance in excess of the prudent reserve
 shall be applied as a credit when determining any fee adjustments for the subsequent fiscal year.

(d) To provide adequate cashflow for the purposes specified in subdivision (b), the Director of Finance, with the concurrence of the Secretary of the Labor and Workforce Development Agency, may approve a short-term loan each fiscal year from the Labor Enforcement and Compliance Fund to the State Public Works Enforcement Fund.

(1) The maximum amount of the annual loan allowable may be up to, but shall not exceed 50 percent of the appropriation authority of the State Public Works Enforcement Fund in the same year in which the loan was made.

(2) For the purposes of this section, a “short-term loan” is a transfer that is made subject to both of the following conditions:

(A) Any amount loaned is to be repaid in full during the same fiscal year in which the loan was made, except that repayment may be delayed until a date not more than 30 days after the date of enactment of the annual Budget Act for the subsequent fiscal year.

(B) Loans shall be repaid whenever the funds are needed to meet cash expenditure needs in the loaning fund or account.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 39, Sec. 28.   (AB 130)   Effective July 10, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

1771.4.

(a) All of the following are applicable to all public works projects that are otherwise subject to the requirements of this chapter:

(1) The call for bids and contract documents shall specify that the project is subject to compliance monitoring and enforcement by the Department of Industrial Relations.

(2) The awarding body shall post or require the prime contractor to post job site notices, as prescribed by regulation.

(3) (A) Each contractor and subcontractor shall furnish the records specified in Section 1776 directly to the Labor Commissioner, in the following manner:

(i) At least monthly or more frequently if specified in the contract with the awarding body. For purposes of this clause, “monthly” means that a submission of records shall be made at least once every 30 days while work is being performed on the project and within 30 days after the final day of work performed on the project.

(ii) In an electronic format, in the manner prescribed by the Labor Commissioner, on the department’s internet website.

(B) A contractor or subcontractor who fails to furnish records pursuant to subparagraph (A), relating to its employees, shall be subject to a penalty by the Labor Commissioner of one hundred dollars ($100) per each day in which the party was in violation of subparagraph (A), not to exceed a total penalty of five thousand dollars ($5,000) per project. Penalties received pursuant to
 this paragraph shall be deposited in the State Public Works Enforcement Fund established by Section 1771.3 and shall be used only for the purposes specified in that section.

(C) The Labor Commissioner shall not levy a penalty pursuant to subparagraph (B) until a contractor or subcontractor fails to furnish the records pursuant to subparagraph (A) 14 days after the requirement set forth in clause (i) of subparagraph (A).

(D) Penalties pursuant to subparagraph (B) may only accrue to the actual contractor or subcontractor who failed to furnish the records pursuant to subparagraph (A).

(4) If the contractor or subcontractor is not registered pursuant to Section 1725.5 and is performing work on a project for which registration is not required because of subdivision (f) of Section 1725.5, the unregistered contractor or
 subcontractor is not required to furnish the records specified in Section 1776 directly to the Labor Commissioner but shall retain the records specified in Section 1776 for at least three years after completion of the work.

(5) The department shall undertake those activities it deems necessary to monitor and enforce compliance with prevailing wage requirements.

(b) The Labor Commissioner may exempt a public works project from compliance with all or part of the requirements of subdivision (a) if either of the following occurs:

(1) The awarding body has enforced an approved labor compliance program, as defined in Section 1771.5, on all public works projects under its authority, except those deemed exempt pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 1771.5, continuously since December 31, 2011.

(2) The awarding body has entered into a collective bargaining agreement that binds all contractors performing work on the project and that includes a mechanism for resolving disputes about the payment of wages.

(c) The requirements of paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) shall only apply to contracts for public works projects awarded on or after January 1, 2015.

(d) The requirements of paragraph (3) of subdivision (a) shall apply to all contracts for public work, whether new or ongoing, on or after January 1, 2016.

(e) (1) No later than July 1, 2024, the department shall develop and implement an online database of electronic certified payroll records submitted pursuant to this section.

(2) The online database created pursuant to paragraph (1) shall only be accessible to multiemployer Taft-Hartley trust funds (29 U.S.C. Sec. 186(c)) and joint labor-management committees established pursuant to the federal Labor Management Cooperation Act of 1978 (29 U.S.C. Sec. 175a).

(3) Electronic certified payroll records included in the online database created pursuant to paragraph (1) shall only contain nonredacted information pursuant to subdivision (e) of Section 1776 that may be provided to multiemployer Taft-Hartley trust funds (29 U.S.C. Sec. 186(c)) and joint labor-management committees established pursuant to the federal Labor Management Cooperation Act of 1978 (29 U.S.C. Sec. 175a) under applicable law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 131, Sec. 139.   (AB 1754)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

1771.5.

(a) Notwithstanding Section 1771, an awarding body may choose not to require the payment of the general prevailing rate of per diem wages or the general prevailing rate of per diem wages for holiday and overtime work for any public works project of twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) or less when the project is for construction work, or for any public works project of fifteen thousand dollars ($15,000) or less when the project is for alteration, demolition, repair, or maintenance work, if the awarding body has elected to initiate and has been approved by the Director of Industrial Relations to enforce a labor compliance program pursuant to subdivision (b) for every public works project under the authority of the awarding body.

(b) For purposes of this section, a labor compliance program shall include, but not be limited to, the following requirements:

(1) All bid invitations and public works contracts shall contain appropriate language concerning the requirements of this chapter.

(2) A prejob conference shall be conducted with the contractor and subcontractors to discuss federal and state labor law requirements applicable to the contract.

(3) Project contractors and subcontractors shall maintain and furnish, at a designated time, a certified copy of each weekly payroll containing a statement of compliance signed under penalty of perjury.

(4) The awarding body shall review, and, if appropriate, audit payroll records to
 verify compliance with this chapter.

(5) The awarding body shall withhold contract payments when payroll records are delinquent or inadequate.

(6) The awarding body shall withhold contract payments equal to the amount of underpayment and applicable penalties when, after investigation, it is established that underpayment has occurred.

(7) The awarding body shall comply with any other prevailing wage monitoring and enforcement activities that are required to be conducted by labor compliance programs by the Department of Industrial Relations.

(c) For purposes of this chapter, “labor compliance program” means a labor compliance program that is approved, as specified in state regulations, by the Director of Industrial Relations.

(d) For purposes of this chapter, the Director of Industrial Relations may revoke the approval of a labor compliance program in the manner specified in state regulations.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 28, Sec. 67.   (SB 854)   Effective June 20, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

1771.6.

(a) Any awarding body that enforces this chapter in accordance with Section 1726 or 1771.5 shall provide notice of the withholding of contract payments to the contractor and subcontractor, if applicable. The notice shall be in writing and shall describe the nature of the violation and the amount of wages, penalties, and forfeitures withheld. Service of the notice shall be completed pursuant to Section 1013 of the Code of Civil Procedure by first-class and certified mail to the contractor and subcontractor, if applicable. The notice shall advise the contractor and subcontractor, if applicable, of the procedure for obtaining review of the withholding of contract payments.

The awarding body shall also serve a copy of the notice by certified mail to any bonding company issuing a bond that secures the payment of wages covered by the notice and to any surety on a bond, if their identities are known to the awarding body.

(b) The withholding of contract payments in accordance with Section 1726 or 1771.5 shall be reviewable under Section 1742 in the same manner as if the notice of the withholding was a civil penalty order of the Labor Commissioner under this chapter. If review is requested, the Labor Commissioner may intervene to represent the awarding body.

(c) Pending a final order, or the expiration of the time period for seeking review of the notice of the withholding, the awarding body shall not disburse any contract payments withheld.

(d) From the amount recovered, the wage claim shall be satisfied prior to the amount being applied to penalties. If insufficient money is recovered to pay each worker in full, the money shall be prorated among all workers.

(e) Wages for workers who cannot be located shall be placed in the Industrial Relations Unpaid Wage Fund and held in trust for the workers pursuant to Section 96.7. Penalties shall be paid into the General Fund of the awarding body that has enforced this chapter pursuant to Section 1771.5.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 954, Sec. 16.   Effective January 1, 2001.   Operative July 1, 2001, by Sec. 21 of Ch. 954.)
-------------------------------------------

1771.7.

(a) (1) For contracts specified in subdivision (f), an awarding body that chooses to use funds derived from either the Kindergarten-University Public Education Facilities Bond Act of 2002 or the Kindergarten-University Public Education Facilities Bond Act of 2004 for a public works project, shall initiate and enforce, or contract with a third party to initiate and enforce, a labor compliance program, as described in subdivision (b) of Section 1771.5, with respect to that public works project.

(2) If an awarding body described in paragraph (1) chooses to contract with a third party to initiate and enforce a labor compliance program for a project described in paragraph (1), that third party shall not
 review the payroll records of its own employees or the employees of its subcontractors, and the awarding body or an independent third party shall review these payroll records for purposes of the labor compliance program.

(b) This section applies to public works that commence on or after April 1, 2003. For purposes of this subdivision, work performed during the design and preconstruction phases of construction, including, but not limited to, inspection and land surveying work, does not constitute the commencement of a public work.

(c) (1) For purposes of this section, if any campus of the California State University chooses to use the funds described in subdivision (a), then the “awarding body” is the Chancellor of the California State University. For purposes of this subdivision, if the chancellor is required by subdivision (a) to initiate and enforce, or to
 contract with a third party to initiate and enforce, a labor compliance program, then in addition to the requirements described in subdivision (b) of Section 1771.5, the Chancellor of the California State University shall review the payroll records on at least a monthly basis to ensure the awarding body’s compliance with the labor compliance program.

(2) For purposes of this subdivision, if an awarding body described in subdivision (a) is the University of California or any campus of that university, and that awarding body is required by subdivision (a) to initiate and enforce, or to contract with a third party to initiate and enforce, a labor compliance program, then in addition to the requirements described in subdivision (b) of Section 1771.5, the payroll records shall be reviewed on at least a monthly basis to ensure the awarding body’s compliance with the labor compliance program.

(d) (1) An awarding body described in subdivision (a) shall make a written finding that the awarding body has initiated and enforced, or has contracted with a third party to initiate and enforce, the labor compliance program described in subdivision (a).

(2) (A) If an awarding body described in subdivision (a) is a school district, the governing body of that district shall transmit to the State Allocation Board, in the manner determined by that board, a copy of the finding described in paragraph (1).

(B) The State Allocation Board shall not release the funds described in subdivision (a) to an awarding body that is a school district until the State Allocation Board has received the written finding described in paragraph (1).

(C) If the State Allocation Board
 conducts a postaward audit procedure with respect to an award of the funds described in subdivision (a) to an awarding body that is a school district, the State Allocation Board shall verify, in the manner determined by that board, that the school district has complied with the requirements of this subdivision.

(3) If an awarding body described in subdivision (a) is a community college district, the Chancellor of the California State University, or the office of the President of the University of California or any campus of the University of California, that awarding body shall transmit, in the manner determined by the Director of Industrial Relations, a copy of the finding described in paragraph (1) to the director of that department, or the director of any successor agency that is responsible for the oversight of employee wage and employee work hours laws.

(e) Because the
 reasonable costs directly related to monitoring and enforcing compliance with the prevailing wage requirements are necessary oversight activities, integral to the cost of construction of the public works projects, notwithstanding Section 17070.63 of the Education Code, the grant amounts as described in Chapter 12.5 (commencing with Section 17070.10) of Part 10 of Division 1 of Title 1 of the Education Code for the costs of a new construction or modernization project shall include the state’s share of the reasonable and directly related costs of the labor compliance program used to monitor and enforce compliance with prevailing wage requirements.

(f) This section shall only apply to contracts awarded prior to January 1, 2012.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 28, Sec. 68.   (SB 854)   Effective June 20, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

1771.8.

(a) For the purposes of this section, the following terms have the following meanings:

(1) A “private labor compliance entity” is defined as a third-party company that is hired by an awarding body to perform labor compliance and enforcement activities on public works projects on its behalf.

(2) A “conflict of interest” is a situation in which a private labor compliance entity performs labor compliance work under contract for both an awarding body, and a contractor who is bidding a public works project for the same awarding body.

(b) (1) A private labor compliance entity shall be prohibited from providing labor compliance and enforcement activities on behalf of an awarding body if it has a conflict of interest.

(2) Prior to an awarding body entering a contract for a public works project, a private labor compliance entity shall disclose a potential conflict of interest to the awarding body. If no conflict exists, a private labor compliance entity shall submit to the awarding body
 a signed declaration under penalty of perjury verifying that it has no conflicts of interest.

(c) A private labor compliance entity, prior to withholding funds from a public works contractor for an alleged violation, including, but not limited to, worker classification, scope of work, travel and subsistence apprenticeship standards, shall do the following:

(1) Confer with the negotiating parties of the applicable agreements to review relevant public works law.

(2) Not withhold an amount that exceeds the alleged underpayments and penalty assessments.

(d) A private labor compliance entity seeking to withhold funds from a public works contractor or subcontractor on behalf of an awarding body pursuant to Sections 1726 and 1771.6 shall, within 20 days of a written request for review by the contractor
 or subcontractor, provide a venue for a public works contractor or subcontractor to review and respond to evidence of alleged violations.

(e) A violation of this section shall make a contract between a private labor compliance entity and an awarding body null and void, and the private labor compliance entity would be subject to a penalty by the awarding body of not less than one thousand dollars ($1,000), including
 reasonable attorney’s fees, subject matter expert costs, and expenses.

(f) In the event of a violation of this section, an aggrieved party, including a joint labor-management committee established pursuant to the federal Labor Management Cooperation Act of 1978 (29 U.S.C. Sec. 175(a)), shall have the right to initiate a private right of action. The private right of action may only be filed against a private labor compliance entity as defined in subdivision (a), an awarding body, or an awarding
 body’s agent. The court shall award reasonable attorney’s fees and costs incurred in maintaining the action, including expert witness fees to a prevailing plaintiff.

(g) In addition, the provisions of this section may be enforced by a public prosecutor as defined in Section 180.

(h) This section does not apply to the following awarding bodies operating labor compliance programs approved and monitored by the Department of Industrial Relations pursuant to Section 1771.5:

(1) The Department of Transportation.

(2) The City of
 Los Angeles.

(3) The Los Angeles Unified School District.

(4) The County of Sacramento.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 991, Sec. 1.   (SB 1303)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

1772.

Workers employed by contractors or subcontractors in the execution of any contract for public work are deemed to be employed upon public work.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1342, Sec. 7.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

1773.

The body awarding any contract for public work, or otherwise undertaking any public work, shall obtain the general prevailing rate of per diem wages and the general prevailing rate for holiday and overtime work in the locality in which the public work is to be performed for each craft, classification, or type of worker needed to execute the contract from the Director of Industrial Relations. The holidays upon which those rates shall be paid need not be specified by the awarding body, but shall be all holidays recognized in the applicable collective bargaining agreement. If the prevailing rate is not based on a collectively bargained rate, the holidays upon which the prevailing rate shall be paid shall be as provided in Section 6700 of the Government Code.

In determining the rates, the Director of Industrial Relations shall ascertain and consider the applicable wage rates established by collective bargaining agreements and the rates that may have been predetermined for federal public works, within the locality and in the nearest labor market area. Where the rates do not constitute the rates actually prevailing in the locality, the director shall obtain and consider further data from the labor organizations and employers or employer associations concerned, including the recognized collective bargaining representatives for the particular craft, classification, or type of work involved. The rate fixed for each craft, classification, or type of work shall be not less than the prevailing rate paid in the craft, classification, or type of work.

If the director determines that the rate of prevailing wage for any craft, classification, or type of worker is the rate established by a collective bargaining agreement, the director may adopt that rate by reference as provided for in the collective bargaining agreement and that determination shall be effective for the life of the agreement or until the director determines that another rate should be adopted.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 30, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

1773.1.

(a) Per diem wages, as the term is used in this chapter or in any other statute applicable to public works, includes employer payments for the following:

(1) Health and welfare.

(2) Pension.

(3) Vacation.

(4) Travel.

(5) Subsistence.

(6) Apprenticeship or other training programs authorized by Section 3093, to the extent that the cost of training is reasonably related to
 the amount of the contributions.

(7) Worker protection and assistance programs or committees established under the federal Labor Management Cooperation Act of 1978 (29 U.S.C. Sec. 175a), to the extent that the activities of the programs or committees are directed to the monitoring and enforcement of laws related to public works.

(8) Industry advancement and collective bargaining agreements administrative fees, provided that these payments are made pursuant to a collective bargaining agreement to which the employer is obligated.

(9) Other purposes similar to those specified in paragraphs (1) to (5), inclusive; or other purposes similar to those specified in paragraphs (6) to (8), inclusive, if the payments are made pursuant
 to a collective bargaining agreement to which the employer is obligated.

(b) Employer payments include all of the following:

(1) The rate of contribution irrevocably made by the employer to a trustee or third person pursuant to a plan, fund, or program.

(2) The rate of actual costs to the employer reasonably anticipated in providing benefits to workers pursuant to an enforceable commitment to carry out a financially responsible plan or program communicated in writing to the workers affected.

(3) Payments to the California Apprenticeship Council pursuant to Section 1777.5.

(c) Employer
 payments are a credit against the obligation to pay the general prevailing rate of per diem wages. However, credit shall not be granted for benefits required to be provided by other state or federal law, for payments made to monitor and enforce laws related to public works if those payments are not made to a program or committee established under the federal Labor Management Cooperation Act of 1978 (29 U.S.C. Sec. 175a), or for payments for industry advancement and collective bargaining agreement administrative fees if those payments are not made pursuant to a collective bargaining agreement to which the employer is obligated. Credits for employer payments also shall not reduce the obligation to pay the hourly straight time or overtime wages found to be prevailing. However, an increased employer payment contribution that results in a lower hourly straight time or overtime wage shall not be considered a
 violation of the applicable prevailing wage determination if all of the following conditions are met:

(1) The increased employer payment is made pursuant to criteria set forth in a collective bargaining agreement.

(2) The basic hourly rate and increased employer payment are no less than the general prevailing rate of per diem wages and the general prevailing rate for holiday and overtime work in the director’s general prevailing wage determination.

(3) The employer payment contribution is irrevocable unless made in error.

(d) An employer may take credit for an employer payment specified in subdivision (b), even if contributions are not made, or costs
 are not paid, during the same pay period for which credit is taken, if the employer regularly makes the contributions, or regularly pays the costs, for the plan, fund, or program on no less than a quarterly basis.

(e) (1) The credit for employer payments shall be computed on an annualized basis when the employer seeks credit for employer payments that are higher for public works projects than for private construction performed by the same employer, unless one or more of the following circumstances exist:

(A) The employer has an enforceable obligation to make the higher rate of payments on future private construction performed by the employer.

(B) The higher rate of payments is required by a project
 labor agreement.

(C) The payments are made to the California Apprenticeship Council pursuant to Section 1777.5.

(2) Paragraph (1) shall apply to all employer payments not made directly to the worker, regardless of whether any contributions are made or benefits are provided with respect to private construction, with the exception of contributions to defined contribution pension plans that provide for both immediate participation and essentially immediate vesting. An employer may take full credit for the hourly amounts contributed to those defined contribution pension plans for public works projects even if the employer contributes at a lower rate or does not make contributions
 to private construction. For purposes of this section, “essentially immediate vesting” means the benefit vests within the first 500 hours worked.

(3) The employer shall have the burden of demonstrating that the credit for employer payments was properly calculated pursuant to this subdivision. The employer shall, upon the request of the Labor Commissioner, produce records of employee hours and employer payments on private construction sufficient for the Labor Commissioner to verify that the credit for employer payments was properly calculated on an annualized basis pursuant to this subdivision. The Labor Commissioner may deny the employer credit for the employer payments if those records are not produced.

(f) Any exemptions to the annualization requirements of subdivision (e) issued by the director prior to January 1, 2026, are revoked.

(g) (1) For the purpose of determining those per diem wages for contracts, the representative of any craft, classification, or type of worker needed to execute contracts shall file with the Department of Industrial Relations fully executed copies of the collective bargaining agreements for the particular craft, classification, or type of work involved. The collective bargaining agreements shall be filed after their execution and thereafter may be taken into consideration pursuant to Section 1773 whenever they are filed 30 days prior to the call for bids. If the collective bargaining agreement has not been formalized, a typescript of the final draft may be filed temporarily,
 accompanied by a statement under penalty of perjury as to its effective date.

(2) When a copy of the collective bargaining agreement has previously been filed, fully executed copies of all modifications and extensions of the agreement that affect per diem wages or holidays shall be filed.

(3) The failure to comply with filing requirements of this subdivision shall not be grounds for setting aside a prevailing wage determination if the information taken into consideration is correct.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 626, Sec. 2.   (AB 889)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

1773.2.

The body awarding any contract for public work, or otherwise undertaking any public work, shall specify in the call for bids for the contract, and in the bid specifications and in the contract itself, what the general rate of per diem wages is for each craft, classification, or type of worker needed to execute the contract.

In lieu of specifying the rate of wages in the call for bids, and in the bid specifications and in the contract itself, the awarding body may, in the call for bids, bid specifications, and contract, include a statement that copies of the prevailing rate of per diem wages are on file at its principal office, which shall be made available to any interested party on request. The awarding body shall also cause a copy of the determination of the director of the prevailing rate of per diem wages to be posted at each job site.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1342, Sec. 8.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

1773.3.

(a) (1) An awarding body shall provide notice to the Department of Industrial Relations of any public works contract subject to the requirements of this chapter, within 30 days of the award, but in no event later than the first day in which a contractor has workers employed upon the public work.

(2) Notwithstanding paragraph (1) and subject to the discretion of the Labor Commissioner, an awarding body shall provide notice to the Department of Industrial Relations of any public works contract awarded pursuant to Section 10122, 20113, 20654, or 22050 of the Public Contract Code that is subject to the requirements of this chapter within 30 days after the award of the contract, but in no event later than the last day in which a contractor has
 workers employed upon the public work.

(3) The notice shall be transmitted electronically in a format specified by the department and shall include the name and registration number issued by the Department of Industrial Relations pursuant to Section 1725.5 of the contractor, the name and registration number issued by the Department of Industrial Relations pursuant to Section 1725.5 of any subcontractor listed on the successful bid, the bid and contract award dates, the contract amount, the estimated start and completion dates, jobsite location, and any additional information the department specifies that aids in the administration and enforcement of this chapter.

(b) In lieu of responding to any specific request for contract award information, the department may make the information provided by awarding bodies pursuant to this section available for public review on its Internet
 Web site.

(c) (1) An awarding body that fails to provide the notice required by subdivision (a) or that enters into a contract with or permits an unregistered contractor or subcontractor to engage in the performance of any public work in violation of the requirements of Section 1771.1, shall, in addition to any other sanction or penalty authorized by law, be subject to a civil penalty of one hundred dollars ($100) for each day in violation of either requirement, not to exceed an aggregate penalty of ten thousand dollars ($10,000) for each project.

(2) The Labor Commissioner shall use the same standards specified in subparagraph (A) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 1775 when determining the severity of the violation and what penalty to assess, and may waive the penalty for a first time violation that was unintentional and did not hinder the Labor
 Commissioner’s ability to monitor and enforce compliance with the requirements of this chapter.

(d) An awarding body shall withhold final payment due to the contractor until at least 30 days after all of the required information in paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) has been submitted, including, but not limited to, providing a complete list of all subcontractors. If an awarding body makes a final payment to a contractor after that time and an unregistered contractor or subcontractor is found to have worked on the project, the awarding body shall be subject to a civil penalty assessed by the Labor Commissioner of one hundred dollars ($100) for each full calendar day of noncompliance, for a period of up to 100 days, for each unregistered contractor or subcontractor.

(e) The Labor Commissioner may issue a citation for civil penalties to the awarding body pursuant to subdivisions (c)
 and (d). The citation shall be served pursuant to Section 1013 of the Code of Civil Procedure by first-class and certified mail.

(f) The procedure for the processing and appeal of a citation or civil penalty issued by the Labor Commissioner pursuant to this section shall be the same as that prescribed in Section 1023. For these purposes, “person” as used in Section 1023 shall include an awarding body.

(g) Whenever the Labor Commissioner determines that an awarding body has willfully violated the requirements of this section or chapter with respect to two or more public works contracts or projects in any 12-month period, the awarding body shall be ineligible to receive state funding or financial assistance for any construction project undertaken by or on behalf of the awarding body for one year, as defined by subdivision (d) of Section 1782. The debarment procedures adopted by the
 Labor Commissioner pursuant to Section 1777.1 shall apply to any determination made under this subdivision.

(h) A contractor or subcontractor shall not be liable for any penalties assessed against an awarding body pursuant to this section. An awarding body may not require a contractor or subcontractor to indemnify or otherwise be liable for any penalties assessed against an awarding body pursuant to this section.

(i) Penalties received pursuant to this section shall be deposited in the State Public Works Enforcement Fund established by Section 1771.3 and shall be used only for the purposes specified in that section.

(j) This section shall apply only if the public works contract is for a project of greater than twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) when the project is for construction, alteration, demolition,
 installation, or repair work or if the public works contract is for a project of greater than fifteen thousand dollars ($15,000) when the project is for maintenance work.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 455, Sec. 3.   (SB 877)   Effective September 17, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

1773.35.

(a) (1) A development proponent shall provide notice to the Department of Industrial Relations of any contract to perform work subject to the requirements of Section 65852.24, 65912.130, 65912.131, 65913.4, or 65913.16 of the Government Code or any contract to perform work where a statute or regulation requires registration pursuant to Section 1725.6 within 30 days of the award, but in no event later than the
 first day in which a contractor has workers employed upon the project or development.

(2) The notice shall be transmitted electronically in a format specified by the department and shall include the name and registration number issued by the Department of Industrial Relations pursuant to Section 1725.6 of the contractor, the name and registration number issued by the Department of Industrial Relations pursuant to Section 1725.6 of any subcontractor listed on the contract, the bid and contract award dates, the estimated start and completion dates, jobsite location, and any additional information the department specifies that aids in the administration and enforcement of the requirements in Section 65852.24, 65912.130, 65912.131, 65913.4, or 65913.16
 of the Government Code and the statutes that require registration pursuant to Section 1725.6 and include prevailing wage or skilled and trained workforce requirements.

(b) In lieu of responding to any specific request for contract award information, the department may make the information provided by development proponents pursuant to this section available for public review on its internet website.

(c) (1) A developer or development proponent that fails to provide the notice required by subdivision (a) or that enters into a contract with or permits an unregistered contractor or subcontractor to engage in the performance of perform work subject to the
 requirements of Section 65852.24, 65912.130, 65912.131, 65913.4, or 65913.16 of the Government Code or perform work where a statute or regulation requires registration pursuant to Section 1725.6, in violation of the requirements of Section 1725.6, shall, in addition to any other sanction or penalty authorized by law, be subject to a civil penalty of one hundred dollars ($100) for each day in violation of either requirement, not to exceed an aggregate penalty of ten thousand dollars ($10,000) for each project or development.

(2) The Labor Commissioner shall use the same standards specified in subparagraph (A) of paragraph (2) of subdivision
 (a) of Section 1775 when determining the severity of the violation and what penalty to assess, and may waive the penalty for a first time violation that was unintentional and did not hinder the Labor Commissioner’s ability to monitor and enforce compliance with the requirements of this chapter or Section 65852.24, 65912.130, 65912.131, 65913.4, or 65913.16 of the Government Code and the statutes that require registration pursuant to Section 1725.6 and include prevailing wage or skilled and trained workforce requirements.

(d) A developer or development
 proponent shall withhold final payment due to the contractor until at least 30 days after all of the required information in paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) has been submitted, including, but not limited to, providing a complete list of all subcontractors. If a developer or development proponent makes a final payment to a contractor after that time and an unregistered contractor or subcontractor is found to have worked on the project, the developer or development proponent shall be subject to a civil penalty assessed by the Labor Commissioner of one hundred dollars ($100) for each full calendar day of noncompliance, for a period of up to 100 days, for each unregistered contractor or subcontractor.

(e) The Labor Commissioner may issue a citation for civil penalties to the developer or development proponent pursuant to subdivisions (c) and (d). The citation shall be served pursuant to Section 1013 of the Code of Civil Procedure by first-class
 and certified mail.

(f) The procedure for the processing and appeal of a citation or civil penalty issued by the Labor Commissioner pursuant to this section shall be the same as that prescribed in Section 1023. For these purposes, “person” as used in Section 1023 shall include a developer or development proponent.

(g) A contractor or subcontractor shall not be liable for any penalties assessed against a developer or development proponent pursuant to this section. A developer or development proponent may not require a contractor or subcontractor to indemnify or otherwise be liable for any penalties assessed against a developer or development proponent pursuant to this section.
